Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
431L]

MEDICAID-RELATED
MANDATES

Section

431L-1 Insurers prohibited from taking medicaid
status into

account

431L-2 State's right to third party payments

431L-2.5 Insurer requirements

431L-3 Coverage of children

431L-4 Employer obligations

431L-5 Recoupment of amounts spent on child
medical care

431L-6 Requirements for coverage of an adopted
child

Cross References

Federally qualified health centers; rural health clinics;
reimbursement, see §346-53.6.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next